Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1523
Obstruction of polling place or building; penalty.

Any person who obstructs the doors or entries or prevents free ingress to and egress from a polling place or building shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 422.